Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.010

Affidavit for writ.

Actions may be commenced upon any agreement in writing before the time for the performance of the contract expires, when the plaintiff or his or her agent shall make and file an affidavit with the clerk of the proper court, that the defendant is about to leave the state without performing or making provisions for the performance of the contract, taking with him or her property, moneys, credits, or effects subject to execution, with intent to defraud plaintiff.

[ 2011 c 336 s 205; Code 1881 s 636; 1877 p 133 s 639; 1869 p 149 s 576; 1854 p 209 s 418; RRS s 778.]